California, session 20252026, AB1834.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66426 of the Government Code is amended to read:66426. (a) A tentative and final map shall be required for all subdivisions creating five or more parcels, five or more condominiums as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, a community apartment project containing five or more parcels, or for the conversion of a dwelling to a stock cooperative containing five or more dwelling units, except if any one of the following occurs:(1) The land before division contains less than five acres, each parcel created by the division abuts upon a maintained public street or highway, and no dedications or improvements are required by the legislative body.(2) Each parcel created by the division has a gross area of 20 acres or more and has an approved access to a maintained public street or highway.(3) The land consists of a parcel or parcels of land having approved access to a public street or highway, which comprises part of a tract of land zoned for industrial, commercial, or mixed-use development, inclusive of mixed-use developments containing residential uses, and which has the approval of the governing body as to street alignments and widths.(4) Each parcel created by the division has a gross area of not less than 40 acres or is not less than a quarter of a quarter section.(5) The land being subdivided is solely for the creation of an environmental subdivision pursuant to Section 66418.2.(b) A parcel map shall be required for those subdivisions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a).